Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1631.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 4810 of Title 36, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
In rural fire departments, fire insurance policies shall provide
coverage in all residential or dwelling policies for a fire
department response at a minimum of two percent (2%) of the property
HB1631 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

valu e. The fire department response fee shall be One Thousand
Dollars ($1000.00) for the first hour and Two Hundred Fifty Dollars
($250.00) for each additional quarter hour. The cost to replace
Class A firefighting foam used to extinguish a fire may be added to
the fire department response fee. This rate shall be reviewed
annually by the Insurance Commissioner of the Oklahoma Insurance
Department, and any increase amounts will be determined by either
the Consumer Price Index or an alternative index the Commissioner
deems appropriate. For purposes of this section, "consumer price
index" means the consumer price index for all urban consumers as
determined by the Bureau of Labor Statistics within the United
States Department of Labor.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6093 of Title 36, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
In rural fire departments, coverage for a fire department
response to a motor vehicle accident shall be provided under the
liability coverage policy. The coverage shall be for a fire
department response at a rate of Five Hundred Forty Dollars
($540.00) per hour for the first hour and One Hundred Thirty-five
Dollars ($135.00) for each additional quarter hour. If powered
rescue equipment is used to extricate a victim or victims, the total
amount will be increased by twenty-five percent (25%). An
additional fee to cover the cost of replacing absorbent materials
HB1631 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

such as oil dry, absorbent pads and booms may also be charged. This
rate shall be reviewed annually by the Insurance Commissioner of the
Oklahoma Insurance Department, and any increase amounts will be
determined by either the Consumer Price Index or an alternative
index the Commissioner deems appropriate. For purposes of this
section, "consumer price index" means the consumer price index for
all urban consumers as determined by the Bureau of Labor Statistics
within the United States Department of Labor.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON GOVERNMENT OVERSIGHT, dated
03/05/2025 - DO PASS, As Amended.













HB1631 HFLR Page 3
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.